Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1,103
Field parole service; duties.

The field parole service, consisting of district parole officers working under the direction of the director or district judge, shall be responsible for the investigation, supervision, and assistance of parolees, probationers, or individuals subject to community supervision under section 83-174.03. The field parole service shall be sufficient in size to assure that no district parole officer carries a case load larger than is compatible with adequate parole investigation or supervision.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 34, p. 3089;

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 29;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 94;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 29;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 142.